Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB92.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with which
the department has contracted for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide
coverage for palliative care in accordance with the following:
(1) In order to be eligible for Medicaid-covered palliative care services, an individual
shall be:
(a) Eligible for and enrolled in the Medicaid program;
(b) In the professional opinion of the individual's care team, in the last two (2)
years of life;
(c) At risk for significant healthcare utilization; and
(d) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, diagnosed with one (1)
or more of the following qualifying conditions:
1. Stage IV cancer of any type;
2. Certain stage III cancers, as determined by the Department for
Medicaid Services in accordance with subsection (4) of this section;
3. NYHA class III or IV advanced heart failure;
4. Stage III or IV chronic obstructive pulmonary disease;
5. End-stage renal disease;
6. End-stage liver disease;
7. Advanced neurological disease;
8. Advanced dementia; or
9. Any other condition identified as a qualifying condition by the
Department for Medicaid Services through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation, including conditions for pediatric patients
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 996
that comply with the requirements of subsection (2)(b)2. of this
section.
(2) (a) An individual shall not be eligible for Medicaid-covered palliative care
services under this section if he or she has a primary diagnosis of substance
use disorder.
(b) An individual who is less than eighteen (18) years of age shall be eligible
for Medicaid-covered palliative care services under this section if he or she:
1. Meets the requirements established in subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of
this section; and
2. Has been diagnosed with an advanced illness or medical condition
that is expected to result in early mortality, complex healthcare needs,
or significant suffering.
(3) Palliative care services covered under this section shall:
(a) Include:
1. Physician oversight;
2. An interdisciplinary team approach;
3. Access to care twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week;
and
4. Regularly scheduled in-person visits by members of the individual's
care team. Telehealth may only be utilized to augment or supplement
in-person care visits; and
(b) Be provided under the scope of current licensure by organizations that hold
a valid and operational hospice license and by providers that are enrolled
Medicare and Medicaid providers. The Department for Medicaid Services
shall not require a separate license to provide palliative care services under
this section.
(4) The Department for Medicaid Services shall promulgate administrative
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 996
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section,
including:
(a) Establishing reimbursement rates and a payment methodology for palliative
care services covered under this section;
(b) Identifying certain stage III cancers that may qualify an individual for
palliative care services covered under this section; and
(c) Quality control measures and reporting requirements to be utilized by the
Department for Medicaid Services to evaluate the cost effectiveness of
palliative care services covered under this section, which shall include:
1. Hospitalization rates;
2. Emergency department utilization rates;
3. Transitions to hospice care;
4. Completion of advanced care planning by individuals receiving
Medicaid-covered palliative care services; and
5. Patient experience.
Section 2. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act is
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request the necessary
federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/19/2025 1:10 PM Jacketed